California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(f) Participate, as a member, in the Delegate Assembly, and in applicable committee meetings, of the Federation of State Boards of Physical Therapy.

(g) Publish, at least annually, a newsletter that includes, but is not limited to, actions taken by the board, disciplinary actions, and relevant statutory and regulatory changes.

(h) Provide for the timely orientation and training of new professional and public member appointees to the board directly related to board licensing
 and disciplinary functions and board rules, policies, and procedures.

(i) Adopt and administer a program of education in matters relevant to the regulation of physical therapy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 10.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2606.

Each member of the board shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 829, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2607.

The board may employ, subject to law, such clerical assistants and, except as provided in Section 159.5, other employees as it may deem necessary to carry out its powers and duties.

The board may enter into contracts for services necessary for enforcement of this chapter and may as necessary select and contract with physical therapy consultants who are licensed physical therapists to assist it in its programs on an intermittent basis. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may contract with these consultants on a sole source basis. For the purposes of Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code, any consultant under contract with the board
 shall be considered a public employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 11.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2607.5.

(a) The board may employ an executive officer exempt from the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and may also employ investigators, legal counsel, physical therapist consultants, and other assistance as it may deem necessary to carry out this chapter. The board may fix the compensation to be paid for services and may incur other expenses as it may deem necessary. Investigators employed by the board shall be provided special training in investigating physical therapy practice activities.

(b) The Attorney General shall act as legal counsel for the board for any judicial and administrative proceedings and
 their services shall be a charge against it.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 509, Sec. 2.   (SB 1438)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2608.

The procedure in all matters and proceedings relating to the denial, suspension, revocation, or probationary restriction of licenses issued by the board under this chapter shall be governed by the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 13.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2608.5.

Each member of the board, or any licensed physical therapist appointed by the board, may inspect, or require reports from, a general or specialized hospital or any other facility providing physical therapy care, treatment or services and the physical therapy staff thereof, with respect to the physical therapy care, treatment, services, or facilities provided therein, and may inspect physical therapy patient records with respect to the care, treatment, services, or facilities. The authority to make inspections and to require reports as provided by this section shall not be delegated by a member of the board to any person other than a physical therapist and shall be subject to the restrictions against disclosure described in
 subdivision (u) of Section 2660.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 14.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2611.

The board shall meet at least three times each calendar year, meeting at least once each calendar year in northern California and once each calendar year in southern California. The board may convene from time to time until its business is concluded. Special meetings of the board may be held at any time and place as the board may designate. Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 16.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2612.

The board shall comply with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 17.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2613.

The board may appoint qualified persons to give the whole or any portion of any examination as provided in this chapter, who shall be designated as a commissioner on examination. A commissioner on examination need not be a member of the board but shall be subject to the same rules and regulations and shall be entitled to the same fee as if he or she were a member of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 829, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2614.

The board shall hear all matters, including, but not limited to, any contested case or any petition for reinstatement, restoration, or modification of probation. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all hearings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. If a contested case is heard by the board the hearing officer who presided at the hearing shall be present during the board’s consideration of the case and, if requested, shall assist and advise the board. The board shall issue its decision pursuant to Section 11517 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 18.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2615.

The board shall adopt those regulations as may be necessary to effectuate this chapter. In adopting regulations the board shall comply with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 19.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Scope of Regulation and Exemptions [2620. - 2634.]

2620.

(a) Physical therapy means the art and science of physical or corrective rehabilitation or of physical or corrective treatment of any bodily or mental condition of any person by the use of the physical, chemical, and other properties of heat, light, water, electricity, sound, massage, and active, passive, and resistive exercise, and shall include physical therapy evaluation, treatment planning, instruction and consultative services. The practice of physical therapy includes the promotion and maintenance of physical fitness to enhance the bodily
 movement related health and wellness of individuals through the use of physical therapy interventions. The use of roentgen rays and radioactive materials, for diagnostic and therapeutic purposes, and the use of electricity for surgical purposes, including cauterization, are not authorized under the term “physical therapy” as used in this chapter, and a license issued pursuant to this chapter does not authorize the diagnosis of disease.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict or prohibit other healing arts practitioners licensed or registered under this division from practice within the scope of their license or registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 117, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2620.1.

(a) In addition to receiving those services authorized by Section 2620, a person may initiate physical therapy treatment directly from a licensed physical therapist if the treatment is within the scope of practice of physical therapists, as defined in Section 2620, and all of the following conditions are met:

(1) If, at any time, the physical therapist has reason to believe that the patient has signs or symptoms of a condition that requires treatment beyond the scope of practice of a physical therapist or the patient is not progressing toward documented treatment goals as demonstrated by objective, measurable, or functional improvement, the physical therapist shall refer the patient to a person holding a physician and surgeon’s certificate issued by the Medical
 Board of California or by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California or to a person licensed to practice dentistry, podiatric medicine, or chiropractic.

(2) The physical therapist shall comply with Section 2633, and shall disclose to the patient any financial interest they have in treating the patient and, if working in a physical therapy corporation, shall comply with Article 6 (commencing with Section 650) of Chapter 1.

(3) With the patient’s written authorization, the physical therapist shall notify the patient’s physician and surgeon, if any, that the physical therapist is treating the patient.

(4) The
 physical therapist shall not continue treating the patient beyond 45 calendar days or 12 visits, whichever occurs first, without receiving, from a person holding a physician and surgeon’s certificate from the Medical Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California or from a person holding a certificate to practice podiatric medicine from the Podiatric Medical Board of California and acting within their scope of practice, a dated signature on the physical therapist’s plan of care indicating approval of the physical therapist’s plan of care. Approval of the physical
 therapist’s plan of care shall include an in-person or telehealth patient examination and evaluation of the patient’s condition, as determined by the physician and surgeon or podiatrist, and, if indicated, testing by the physician and surgeon or podiatrist.

(b) The conditions in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) do not apply to a physical therapist under either of the following circumstances:

(1) When
 the physical therapist is only providing wellness physical therapy services to a patient as described in subdivision (a) of Section 2620.

(2) Pursuant to Section 56363 of the Education Code or Section 7572 of the Government Code, when the physical therapist is providing physical therapy services as part of an individualized family service plan or an individualized education plan pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and the individual receiving those services does not have a medical diagnosis.

(c) (1) This section does not expand or modify the scope of
 practice for physical therapists set forth in Section 2620, including the prohibition on a physical therapist diagnosing a disease.

(2) This section does not restrict or alter the scope of practice of any other health care professional.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a health care service plan, insurer, workers’ compensation insurance plan, employer, or state program to provide coverage for direct access to treatment by a physical therapist.

(e) When a person initiates physical therapy treatment services directly, pursuant to this section, the physical therapist shall not perform physical therapy treatment services without first providing the following notice to the patient, orally and in writing, in at least 14-point type and signed by the patient:

 

“Direct Physical Therapy Treatment Services

 

You are receiving direct physical therapy treatment services from an individual who is a physical therapist licensed by the Physical Therapy Board of California.

Under California law, you may continue to receive direct physical therapy treatment services for a period of up to 45 calendar days or 12 visits, whichever occurs first, after which time a physical therapist may continue providing you with physical therapy treatment services only after receiving, from a person holding a physician and surgeon’s certificate issued by the Medical Board of California or by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, or from a person holding a certificate to practice podiatric medicine from the
 Podiatric Medical Board of California and acting within their scope of practice, a dated signature on the physical therapist’s plan of care indicating approval of the physical therapist’s plan of care and that an in-person or telehealth patient examination and evaluation was conducted by the physician and surgeon or podiatrist.

Patient’s Signature/Date”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 509, Sec. 3.   (SB 1438)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2620.3.

A physical therapist licensed pursuant to this chapter may apply topical medications as part of the practice of physical therapy as defined in Section 2620 if he or she complies with regulations duly adopted by the board pursuant to this section and the Administrative Procedure Act. The board shall adopt regulations implementing this section after meeting and conferring with the Medical Board of California and the California State Board of Pharmacy specifying those topical medications applicable to the practice of physical therapy and protocols for their use.
 Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a physical therapist to prescribe medications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 829, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2620.5.

A physical therapist may, upon specified authorization of a physician and surgeon, perform tissue penetration for the purpose of evaluating neuromuscular performance as a part of the practice of physical therapy, as defined in Section 2620, provided the physical therapist is certified by the board to perform the tissue penetration and evaluation and provided the physical therapist does not develop or make diagnostic or prognostic interpretations of the data obtained. Any physical therapist who develops or makes a diagnostic or prognostic interpretation of this data
 is in violation of the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2), and may be subject to all of the sanctions and penalties set forth in that act.

The board, after meeting and conferring with the Division of Licensing of the Medical Board of California, shall do all of the following:

(a) Adopt standards and procedures for tissue penetration for the purpose of evaluating neuromuscular performance by certified physical therapists.

(b) Establish standards for physical therapists to perform tissue penetration for the purpose of evaluating neuromuscular performance.

(c) Certify physical therapists meeting standards established by the board pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 427, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2620.7.

(a) Patient records shall be documented as required in regulations promulgated by the board.

(b) Patient records shall be maintained for a period of no less than seven years following the discharge of the patient, except that the records of unemancipated minors shall be maintained at least one year after the minor has reached 18 years of age,
 and not in any case less than seven years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 21.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2621.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing a physical therapist to practice medicine, surgery, or any other form of healing except as authorized by Section 2620.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

2622.

(a) A physical therapist shall be responsible for managing all aspects of the care of each patient as set forth in regulations promulgated by the board.

(b) A physical therapist shall not supervise more than two physical therapist assistants at one time to assist the physical therapist in his or her practice of physical therapy.

(c) A physical therapist may utilize the services of one aide engaged in patient-related tasks to aid the physical therapist in his or her practice of physical therapy.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 23.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2623.

The board may, by regulation, prescribe, amend, or repeal any rules contained within a code of professional conduct appropriate to the establishment and maintenance of integrity and dignity in the profession of physical therapy. Every licensee of the board shall be governed and controlled by the rules and standards adopted by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 24.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2630.

It is unlawful for any person or persons to practice, or offer to practice, physical therapy in this state for compensation received or expected, or to hold himself or herself out as a physical therapist, unless at the time of so doing the person holds a valid, unexpired, and unrevoked physical therapist license issued under this chapter, except as authorized by subdivisions (c), (d), (e), and (g) of Section
 2630.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 26.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2630.3.

(a) A licensed physical therapist assistant holding a valid, unexpired, and unrevoked physical therapist assistant license may assist in the provision of physical therapy services only under the supervision of a physical therapist licensed by the board. A licensed physical therapist shall at all times be responsible for the extent, kind, quality, and documentation of all physical therapy services provided by the physical therapist assistant. 

(b) It is unlawful for any person or persons to hold himself or herself out as a physical therapist assistant, unless at the time of so doing the person holds a valid, unexpired, and unrevoked physical therapist assistant license issued under this chapter, except as authorized in subdivisions (f) and (g) of Section 2630.5. 

(c) Physical therapist assistants shall not be independently supervised by a physical therapist license applicant, as defined in Section 2639, or a physical therapist student, as defined in Section 2633.7. 

(d) A physical therapist assistant shall not perform any evaluation of a patient or prepare a discharge summary. The supervising physical therapist shall determine which elements of the treatment plan, if any, shall be assigned to the physical therapist assistant. Assignment of patient care shall
 be commensurate with the competence of the physical therapist assistant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 27.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2630.4.

(a) A “physical therapy aide” is an unlicensed person, at least 18 years of age, who aids a licensed physical therapist consistent with subdivision (b). 

(b) The aide shall at all times be under the supervision of the physical therapist. An aide shall not independently perform physical therapy or any physical therapy procedure. The board shall adopt regulations that set forth the standards and
 requirements for the supervision of an aide by a physical therapist. 

(c) Physical therapy aides shall not be independently supervised by a physical therapist license applicant, as defined in Section 2639, or a physical therapist student, as defined in Section 2633.7. 

(d) This section does not prohibit the administration by a physical therapy aide of massage, external baths, or normal exercise not a part of a physical therapy treatment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 28.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2630.5.

The following persons are exempt from the licensure requirements of this chapter when engaged in the following activities: 

(a) A regularly matriculated physical therapist student undertaking a course of professional instruction in an approved entry-level physical therapy education program or enrolled in a program of supervised clinical education under the direction of an approved physical therapy education program as
 described in Section 2651. These physical therapist students may perform physical therapy as a part of their course of study. 

(b) A regularly matriculated physical therapist assistant student undertaking a course of instruction in an approved physical therapy education program or enrolled in a program of supervised clinical education under the direction of an approved physical therapy education program as described in Section 2651. These physical therapist assistant students may perform physical therapy techniques as a part of their course of study. 

(c) A physical therapist who holds a valid and unrestricted license in another jurisdiction of the United States or who is credentialed to practice physical therapy in another country if that person is researching, demonstrating, or providing physical therapy in connection with teaching or participating in an educational seminar of
 no more than 60 days in a calendar year. 

(d) A physical therapist located outside this state, when in actual consultation, whether within this state or across state lines, with a licensed physical therapist of this state, or when he or she is an invited guest of the American Physical Therapy Association or one of its components, or an invited guest of an approved physical therapy school or college for the sole purpose of engaging in professional education through lectures, clinics, or demonstrations, if, at the time of the consultation, lecture, or demonstration, he or she holds a valid and unrestricted physical therapist license in the state or country in which he or she resides. The physical therapist shall not open an office, appoint a place to meet patients, receive calls from patients within the limits of this state, give orders, or have ultimate authority over the care of a physical therapy patient who is located within this state. 

(e) A physical therapist who holds a valid and unrestricted license in another jurisdiction of the United States or credentialed to practice physical therapy in another country if that person, by contract or employment, is providing physical therapy to individuals affiliated with or employed by established athletic teams, athletic organizations, or performing arts companies temporarily practicing, competing, or performing in the state for no more than 60 days in a calendar year. 

(f) A physical therapist assistant who holds a valid and unrestricted license in another jurisdiction of the United States and is assisting a physical therapist engaged in activities described in subdivision (c), (d), or (e). 

(g) A physical therapist or physical therapist assistant who has a valid and unrestricted license in a jurisdiction of
 the United States who is forced to leave his or her residence in a state other than California due to a governmentally declared emergency. This exemption applies for no more than 60 days following the declaration of the emergency. In order to be eligible for this exemption, the physical therapist or physical therapist assistant shall notify the board of his or her intent to practice in this state and provide a valid mailing address, telephone number, and email address.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 29.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2633.

(a) A person holding a license as a physical therapist issued by the board may use the title “physical therapist” or the letters “P.T.” or any other words, letters, or figures that indicate that the person using same is a licensed physical therapist. No other person shall be so designated or shall use the term licensed or registered physical therapist, licensed or registered physiotherapist, licensed or registered physical therapy technician, or the letters “L.P.T.,” “R.P.T.,” or “P.T.”.

(b) A licensed physical therapist who has received a doctoral degree in physical therapy (DPT) or, after adoption of the regulations described in subdivision (d), a doctoral degree in a related health science may do the following:

(1) In a written communication, use the initials DPT, PhD, or EdD, as applicable, following the licensee’s name.

(2) In a written communication, use the title “Doctor” or the abbreviation “Dr.” preceding the licensee’s name, if the licensee’s name is immediately followed by an unabbreviated specification of the applicable doctoral degree held by the licensee.

(3) In a spoken communication while engaged in the practice of physical therapy, use the title “doctor” preceding the person’s name, if the speaker specifies that he or she is
 a physical therapist.

(c) A doctoral degree described in subdivision (b) shall be granted by an institution accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges or by an accrediting agency recognized by the National Commission on Accrediting or the United States Department of Education that the board determines is equivalent to the Western Association of Schools and Colleges.

(d) The board shall define, by regulation, the doctoral degrees that are in a related health science for purposes of subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 222, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2633.5.

(a) Only a person licensed as a physical therapist assistant by the board may use the title “physical therapist assistant” or “physical therapy assistant” or the letters “PTA” or any other words, letters, or figures that indicate that the person is a physical therapist assistant licensed pursuant to this chapter. 

(b) The license of a physical therapist assistant shall not authorize the use of the
 prefix “LPT,” “RPT,” “PT,” or “Dr.,” or the title “physical therapist,” “therapist,” “doctor,” or any affix indicating or implying that the physical therapist assistant is a physical therapist or doctor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 31.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2633.7.

During a period of clinical practice described in Section 2650 or in any similar period of observation of related educational experience involving recipients of physical therapy, a person so engaged shall be identified only as a “physical therapist student” or a “physical therapist assistant student,” as authorized by the board in its regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 32.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2634.

The board may investigate each and every applicant for a license, before a license is issued, in order to determine whether or not the applicant has in fact the qualifications required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 829, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Qualifications and Requirements for Licensure [2635. - 2639.1.]

2635.

Every applicant for a license under this chapter shall, at the time of application, be a person over 18 years of age, not addicted to alcohol or any controlled substance, have successfully completed the education and training required by Section 2650, and not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 956, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2636.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no person shall receive a license under this chapter without first successfully passing the following examinations, where success is determined based on the examination passing standard set by the board:

(1) An examination under the direction of the board to demonstrate the applicant’s knowledge of the laws and regulations related to the practice of physical therapy in California. The examination shall reasonably test the applicant’s knowledge of these laws and regulations.

(2) The physical therapy examination for the applicant’s licensure
 category. The examination for licensure as a physical therapist shall test entry-level competence to practice physical therapy. The examination for licensure as a physical therapist assistant shall test entry-level competence to practice as a physical therapist assistant in the technical application of physical therapy services.

(b) An applicant may take the examinations for licensure as a physical therapist or for licensure as a physical therapist assistant after the applicant has met the educational requirements for that particular category of licensure.

(c) The examinations required by the board for a license under this chapter may be conducted by the board or by a public or private organization specified by the board. The examinations may be conducted under a uniform
 examination system and, for that purpose, the board may make arrangements with organizations furnishing examination materials as may, in its discretion, be
 desirable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 34.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2636.5.

(a) An applicant may be issued a license without a written examination if he or she meets all of the following:

(1) He or she is at the time of application licensed as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant in a state, district, or territory of the United States having, in the opinion of the board, requirements for licensing equal to or higher than those in California, and he or she has passed, to the satisfaction of the board, an examination for licensing that is, in the opinion of the board, comparable to the examination used in this state.

(2) He or she is a graduate of a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant education program approved by the board, or has met the requirements of Section 2653.

(3) He or she files an application with the board and meets the requirements prescribed by Sections 2635 and 2650.

(b) An applicant for licensure under subdivision (a), whose application is based on a certificate issued by a physical therapy licensing authority of another state may be required to file a statement of past work activity.

(c) An applicant who has filed a physical therapy application under this section with the board for the first time may, between the date of receipt of notice that his or her application is on file and the date of receipt of his or her license, perform as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant, as appropriate, under the supervision of a physical therapist licensed in this state.

During this period the applicant shall identify himself or herself only as a “physical therapist license applicant” or “physical therapist assistant license applicant,” as appropriate.

If the applicant under this section does not qualify and receive a license as provided in this section and does not qualify under Section 2639, all privileges under this
 section shall terminate upon notice by the board. An applicant may only qualify once to perform as a physical therapist license applicant or physical therapist assistant license applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 35.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2638.

Any applicant for licensure as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant who fails to pass the examination required by the board may retake the licensing examination and shall pay the reexamination fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 36.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2639.

(a) (1) Every graduate of an approved physical therapy education program who has filed a complete application, as defined in regulation, for licensure with the board and has been awarded either physical therapist license applicant status or physical therapist assistant license applicant status shall practice under the supervision of a licensed physical therapist pursuant to this chapter for no more than 120 days pending the results of the first licensing examination administered. If the applicant passes the examination, the physical therapist license applicant status or physical therapist assistant license applicant status shall remain in effect until a regular renewable license is issued, or licensure is
 denied, by the board. A supervising physical therapist shall document receipt of the letter authorizing the physical therapist license applicant status or physical therapist assistant license applicant status and record the expiration date of that status in the employee record. A supervising physical therapist shall require the applicant to provide documentation of the license issued at the conclusion of the physical therapist license applicant status or physical therapist assistant license applicant status. During this period the applicant shall identify himself or herself only as “physical therapist license applicant” or “physical therapist assistant license applicant,” as appropriate. 

(2) A person shall not be considered a graduate unless he or she has successfully completed all the clinical training and internship required for
 graduation from the education program. 

(b) A physical therapist license applicant who has been awarded license applicant status may perform as a physical therapist if he or she is under the supervision of a physical therapist licensed by the board. A physical therapist assistant license applicant who has been awarded license applicant status may perform as a physical therapist assistant if he or she is under the supervision of a physical therapist licensed by the board. The applicant shall comply with any requirements applicable to the license for which he or she applied. An applicant may not perform in those capacities if he or she fails the first examination attempt.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 38.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2639.1.

A person having, in the opinion of the board, training or experience, or a combination of training and experience, equivalent to that obtained in an approved physical therapist assistant education program and who meets the requirements of Section 2635 may apply for licensure as a physical therapist assistant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 39.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Renewal of Licenses [2644. - 2649.]

2644.

(a) Every license issued under this chapter shall expire at 12 a.m. on the last day of the birth month of the licensee during the second year of a two-year term, if not renewed. 

(b) To renew an unexpired license, the licensee shall, on or before the date on which it would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, pay the prescribed renewal fee, and submit proof of the completion of continuing competency required by the board pursuant to Section 2649. The licensee shall disclose on his or her license renewal application any misdemeanor or other criminal offense for which he or she has been found guilty or to which he or she has pleaded guilty
 or no contest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 41.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2645.

At least 60 days before the expiration of any license, the board shall mail to each licensee under this chapter, at the latest address furnished by the licensee to the board, a notice stating the amount of the renewal fee and the date on which it is due, and that failure to pay it on or before the due date shall result in expiration of the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 41.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2646.

A license that has expired may be renewed at any time within five years after its expiration by applying for renewal as set forth in Section 2644. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the renewal application is filed, on the date on which the renewal fee or accrued renewal fees are paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee and penalty fee, if any, are paid, whichever last occurs. A renewed license shall continue in effect through the expiration date set forth in Section 2644 that next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, at which time it shall expire and become invalid if it is not so renewed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 41.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2647.

A person who fails to renew his or her license within five years after its expiration may not renew it, and it shall not be reissued, reinstated, or restored thereafter. However, the person may apply for a new license if he or she satisfies the requirements set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 2635).

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 41.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2648.

(a) A licensee is exempt from the payment of the renewal fee while engaged in full-time training or active service in the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marines, or Coast Guard, or in the United States Public Health Service. 

(b) A person exempted from the payment of the renewal fee by this section shall not engage in any practice of, or assistance in the provision of, physical therapy not related to his or her military service and shall become liable for payment of the fee for the current renewal period upon his or her discharge from full-time active service and shall have a period of 60 days after becoming liable within which to pay the renewal fee before the
 delinquency fee is required. Any person who is discharged from active service
 within 60 days of the end of the renewal period is exempt from the payment of the renewal fee for that period. 

(c) The time spent in full-time active service or training shall not be included in the computation of the five-year period for renewal and reinstatement of licensure provided in Section 2646. 

(d) A person exempt from renewal fees under this section shall not be exempt from meeting the requirements of Section 2649.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 41.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2648.3.
